Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-602
City, defined; population; how determined.

For purposes of the City Manager Plan of Government Act, city means any city having a population of one thousand or more and less than two hundred thousand inhabitants. The population of a city shall be the number of inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 2, p. 498;

C.S.1922, § 4539;

C.S.1929, § 19-602;

R.S.1943, § 19-602;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 28;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 33.